Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.536

Test to earn a high school equivalency certificate—Rules—Issuance of high school equivalency certificate.

(1) Subject to rules adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190, the state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules governing the eligibility of persons sixteen years of age and older to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate, rules governing the administration of the test, and rules governing the issuance of a high school equivalency certificate to persons who successfully complete the test.

(2) A high school equivalency certificate is a certificate issued jointly by the college board and the office of the superintendent of public instruction that indicates that the holder has attained standard scores at or above the minimum proficiency level prescribed by the college board on a high school equivalency test. The college board must identify and accept a high school equivalency test that is at least as rigorous as the general educational development test. The high school equivalency test identified by the college board must cover reading, writing, mathematics, science, and social studies subject areas.

(3) High school equivalency certificates issued under this section shall be issued in such form and substance as agreed upon by the state board for community and technical colleges and superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2013 c 39 s 9; 1993 c 218 s 3.]